Illinois, session 104th, SB1959.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Highway Code is amended by 5changing Sections 5-907 and 5-918 and by adding Section 65-918.1 as follows: 7    (605 ILCS 5/5-907)  (from Ch. 121, par. 5-907)8    Sec. 5-907. Advisory Committee. A road improvement impact 9fee advisory committee shall be created by the unit of local 10government intending to impose impact fees. The Advisory 11Committee shall consist of not less than 10 members and not 12more than 20 members. Not less than 40% of the members of the 13committee shall be representatives of the real estate, 14development, and building industries and the labor communities 15and may not be employees or officials of the unit of local 16government.17    (a) The members of the Advisory Committee shall be 18selected as follows: 19        (1) The representatives of real estate shall be 20    licensed under the Real Estate License Act of 2000 and 21    shall be designated by the President of the Illinois 22    Association of Realtors from a local Board from the 23    service area or areas of the unit of local government.   SB1959- 2 -LRB104 10529 LNS 20604 b1        (2) The representatives of the development industry 2    shall be designated by the Regional Developers 3    Association. 4        (3) The representatives of the building industry shall 5    be designated representatives of the Regional Home 6    Builders representing the unit of local government's 7    geographic area as appointed from time to time by that 8    Association's president. 9        (4) The labor representatives shall be chosen by 10    either the Central Labor Council or the Building and 11    Construction Trades Council having jurisdiction within the 12    unit of local government.13    (b) If the unit of local government is a county, at least 1430% of the members serving on the commission must be 15representatives of the municipalities within the county. The 16municipal representatives shall be selected by a convention of 17mayors in the county, who shall elect from their membership 18municipal representatives to serve on the Advisory Committee. 19The members representing the county shall be appointed by the 20chief executive officer of the county.21    (c) If the unit of local government is a municipality, the 22non-public representatives shall be appointed by the chief 23executive officer of the municipality.24    (d) Each unit of local government which imposes or intends 25to impose impact fees and which has created an Advisory 26Committee, shall publish the names of said Advisory Committee   SB1959- 3 -LRB104 10529 LNS 20604 b1members names on the public website maintained by the unit of 2local government, together with a list of the dates and times 3at which the Advisory Committee has met and provide an 4electronically accessible copy of the minutes of any such 5meetings.6    If the unit of local government has a planning or zoning 7commission, the unit of local government may elect to use its 8planning or zoning commission to serve as the Advisory 9Committee, provided that not less than 40% of the committee 10members include representatives of the real estate, 11development, and building industries and the labor communities 12who are not employees or officials of the unit of local 13government. A unit of local government may appoint additional 14members to serve on the planning or zoning commission as ad hoc 15voting members whenever the planning or zoning commission 16functions as the Advisory Committee; provided that no less 17than 40% of the members include representatives of the real 18estate, development, and building industries and the labor 19communities.20(Source: P.A. 91-245, eff. 12-31-99.) 21    (605 ILCS 5/5-918)  (from Ch. 121, par. 5-918)22    Sec. 5-918. Transition Clauses. 23    (a) Conformance of Existing Ordinances. A unit of local 24government which currently has in effect an impact fee 25ordinance or resolution shall have not more than 12 months   SB1959- 4 -LRB104 10529 LNS 20604 b1from July 1, 2025 26, 1989 to bring its ordinance or resolution 2into conformance with the requirements imposed by this Act, 3except that a home rule unit of local government with a 4population over 75,000 and located in a county with a 5population over 600,000 and less than 2,000,000 shall have not 6more than 18 months from July 1, 2025 26, 1989, to bring that 7ordinance or resolution into conformance. For the purposes of 8this provision, conformance shall also mean compliance with 9Section 5-907. 10    (b) Exemption of Developments Receiving Site Specific 11Development Approval. No development which has received site 12specific development approval from a unit of local government 13within 18 months before the first date of publication by the 14unit of local government of a notice of public hearing to 15consider land use assumptions relating to the development of a 16comprehensive road improvement plan and imposition of impact 17fees and which has filed for building permits or certificates 18of occupancy within 18 months of the date of approval of the 19site specific development plan shall be required to pay impact 20fees for permits or certificates of occupancy issued within 21that 18 month period.22    This Division shall have no effect on the validity of any 23existing agreements entered into between a developer and a 24unit of local government pertaining to fees, exactions or 25donations made by a developer for the purpose of funding road 26improvements.  SB1959- 5 -LRB104 10529 LNS 20604 b1    (c) Exception to the Exemption of Developments Receiving 2Site Specific Development Approval. Nothing in this Section 3shall require the refund of impact fees previously collected 4by units of local government in accordance with their 5ordinances or resolutions, if such ordinances or resolutions 6were adopted prior to the effective date of this Act and 7provided that such impact fees are encumbered as provided in 8Section 5-916.9(Source: P.A. 86-97; 86-1158.) 10    (605 ILCS 5/5-918.1 new)11    Sec. 5-918.1. Refund for noncompliance. Any unit of local 12government which has in effect an impact fee ordinance or 13resolution on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 14104th General Assembly and which has not brought their impact 15fee ordinance or resolution into compliance with this Act by 16the date provided for in Section 5-918, shall refund all funds 17previously collected under said impact fee ordinance or 18resolution together with any interest earned on the same. Any 19impact fee ordinance or resolution that does not conform with 20this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly by the date 21provided for in Section 5-918, shall be considered null and 22void. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 241, 2026.